ro-RO: Preocupare țintă a pielii: Calozități; Negi comuni; Bătături; Pete întunecate; Negi filiformi; Negi plani; Negi genitali; Hiperpigmentare; Cârtițe; Negi plantari; Papilome cutanate; Altele
pt-PT: Preocupação de pele alvo: Calosidades; Verrugas comuns; Calos; Manchas escuras; Verrugas filiformes; Verrugas planas; Verrugas genitais; Hiperpigmentação; Toupeiras; Verrugas plantares; Pólipos de pele; Outro
cs: Cílený kožní problém: Mozoly; Běžné bradavice; Kuří oka; Tmavé skvrny; Nitkovité bradavice; Ploché bradavice; Genitální bradavice; Hyperpigmentace; Krtci; Plantární bradavice; Kožní výrůstky; Jiné
sv: Riktad hudåkomma: Förhårdnader; Vanliga vårtor; Liktornar; Mörka fläckar; Trådlika vårtor; Platta vårtor; Könsvårtor; Hyperpigmentering; Mullvadar; Fotvårtor; Hudtaggar; Övrigt
ru: Целевая проблема кожи: Натоптыши; Обыкновенные бородавки; Мозоли; Темные пятна; Нитевидные бородавки; Плоские бородавки; Генитальные бородавки; Гиперпигментация; Кроты; Подошвенные бородавки; Папилломы; Другой
vi: Vấn đề da mục tiêu: Vết chai; Mụn cóc thông thường; Chai chân; Đốm nâu; Mụn cóc dạng sợi; Mụn cóc phẳng; Mụn cóc sinh dục; Tăng sắc tố; Chuột chù; Mụn cóc ở gan bàn chân; Mụn thịt; Khác
lt-LT: Tikslinė odos problema: Nukutimai; Paprastos karpos; Nuospaudos; Tamsios dėmės; Siūlinės karpos; Plokščios karpos; Lyties organų karpos; Hiperpigmentacija; Kurmiai; Padų karpos; Odos išaugos; Kita
de: Konkretes Hautproblem: Schwielen; Gewöhnliche Warzen; Hühneraugen; Dunkle Flecken; Filiforme Warzen; Flache Warzen; Genitalwarzen; Hyperpigmentierung; Maulwürfe; Plantarwarzen; Hautanhängsel; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Целеви кожен проблем: Твърда кожа; Обикновени брадавици; Мазоли; Тъмни петна; Нишковидни брадавици; Плоски брадавици; Генитални брадавици; Хиперпигментация; Къртици; Плантарни брадавици; Кожни израстъци; Други
pt-BR: Preocupação de pele alvo: Calosidades; Verrugas comuns; Calos; Manchas escuras; Verrugas filiformes; Verrugas planas; Verrugas genitais; Hiperpigmentação; Toupeiras; Verrugas plantares; Acrocórdons; Outro
fr: Préoccupation de peau cible: Callosités; Verrues communes; Cors; Taches sombres; Verrues filiformes; Verrues planes; Verrues génitales; Hyperpigmentation; Taupes; Verrues plantaires; Acrochordons; Autre
zh-TW: 針對的皮膚問題: 繭; 一般疣; 雞眼; 黑斑; 絲狀疣; 扁平疣; 生殖器疣; 色素沉著過度; 鼴鼠; 足底疣; 皮贅; 其他
en: Targeted skin concern: Calluses; Common warts; Corns; Dark spots; Filiform warts; Flat warts; Genital warts; Hyperpigmentation; Moles; Plantar warts; Skin tags; Other
sk-SK: Cielená starostlivosť o pleť: Mozole; Bežné bradavice; Kurje oká; Tmavé škvrny; Vláknité bradavice; Ploché bradavice; Genitálne bradavice; Hyperpigmentácia; Krtkovia; Plantárne bradavice; Kožné výrastky; Iné
tr: Hedeflenen cilt sorunu: Kalınlaşmış deri; Yaygın siğiller; Nasırlar; Koyu lekeler; İpliksi siğiller; Düz siğiller; Genital siğiller; Hiperpigmentasyon; Köstebekler; Plantar siğiller; Deri eti; Diğer
pl: Docelowy problem skórny: Modzele; Brodawki zwykłe; Odciski; Ciemne plamy; Brodawki nitkowate; Brodawki płaskie; Brodawki narządów płciowych; Hiperpigmentacja; Krety; Brodawki podeszwowe; Włókniaki miękkie; Inne
da: Målrettet hudproblem: Hård hud; Almindelige vorter; Ligtorne; Mørke pletter; Filiformvorter; Flade vorter; Kønsvorter; Hyperpigmentering; Muldvarpe; Fodvorter; Hudvedhæng; Andet
ja: 対象肌悩み: たこ; 尋常性疣贅; 魚の目; 黒ずみ; 糸状疣贅; 扁平疣贅; 性器疣贅; 色素沈着; モグラ; 足底疣贅; スキンタグ; その他
nb: Målrettet hudbekymring: Hård hud; Vanlige vorter; Liktorn; Mørke flekker; Trådvorter; Flate vorter; Kjønnsvorter; Hyperpigmentering; Muldvarper; Fotvorter; Hudlapper; Annet
hr-HR: Ciljani kožni problem: Žuljevi; Obične bradavice; Kurje oči; Tamne mrlje; Filiformne bradavice; Ravne bradavice; Genitalne bradavice; Hiperpigmentacija; Krtice; Plantarne bradavice; Kožni izraštaji; Ostalo
zh-CN: 目标皮肤问题: 老茧; 普通疣; 鸡眼; 黑斑; 丝状疣; 扁平疣; 生殖器疣; 色素沉着过度; 鼹鼠; 跖疣; 皮赘; 其他
el: Στοχευμένη ανησυχία δέρματος: Σκληρύνσεις; Κοινές μυρμηκιές; Κάλοι; Σκούρες κηλίδες; Νηματοειδείς μυρμηκιές; Επίπεδες μυρμηκιές; Κονδυλώματα γεννητικών οργάνων; Υπερχρωμία; Τυφλοπόντικες; Πελματιαίες μυρμηκιές; Δερματικές ετικέτες; Άλλο
hu: Célzott bőrprobléma: Bőrkeményedések; Közönséges szemölcsök; Tyúkszemek; Sötét foltok; Fonalszerű szemölcsök; Lapos szemölcsök; Nemi szemölcsök; Hiperpigmentáció; Vakond; Talpi szemölcsök; Bőrkinövések; Egyéb
sl-SI: Ciljna skrb za kožo: Otiščanci; Navadne bradavice; Kurja očesa; Temne lise; Nitaste bradavice; Ploščate bradavice; Genitalne bradavice; Hiperpigmentacija; Krti; Plantarne bradavice; Kožne izrastline; Drugo
th: ปัญหาผิวที่มุ่งเป้า: หนังหนา; หูดธรรมดา; ตาปลา; จุดด่างดำ; หูดแบบเส้น; หูดแบน; หูดอวัยวะเพศ; รอยหมองคล้ำ; ตุ่น; หูดฝ่าเท้า; ไฝเนื้อ; อื่นๆ
es: Preocupación cutánea objetivo: Callosidades; Verrugas comunes; Callos; Manchas oscuras; Verrugas filiformes; Verrugas planas; Verrugas genitales; Hiperpigmentación; Topos; Verrugas plantares; Acrocordones; Otros
it: Problema cutaneo target: Duroni; Verruche comuni; Calli; Macchie scure; Verruche filiformi; Verruche piane; Verruche genitali; Iperpigmentazione; Talpe; Verruche plantari; Fibromi penduli; Altro
ko: 표적 피부 고민: 굳은살; 일반 사마귀; 티눈; 다크 스팟; 사상 사마귀; 편평 사마귀; 생식기 사마귀; 과색소침착; 두더지; 족저 사마귀; 쥐젖; 기타
fi: Kohdennettu iho-ongelma: Kovettumat; Tavalliset syylät; Liikavarpaat; Tummat läiskät; Lankasyylät; Litteat syylät; Sukuelinten syylät; Hyperpigmentaatio; Myyrät; Jalkapohjasyylät; Ihokasvaimet; Muu
nl: Gerichte huidaandoening: Eeltplekken; Gewone wratten; Eksterogen; Donkere vlekken; Draadvormige wratten; Platte wratten; Genitale wratten; Hyperpigmentatie; Mollen; Voetwratten; Huidaanhangsels; Andere